Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.110

Registration—Payment—Assignment.

Upon the presentation at the office of the officer or agent hereinafter provided for, any bond which is bearer in form that has heretofore been or may hereafter be issued by any county, city, town, port, school district, or other municipal or quasi municipal corporation in this state, may, if so provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the same, be registered as to principal in the name of the owner upon the books of such municipality to be kept in said office, such registration to be noted on the reverse of the bond by such officer or agent. The principal of any bond so registered shall be payable only to the payee, his or her legal representative, successors or assigns, and such bond shall be transferable to another registered holder or back to bearer only upon presentation to such officer or agent, with a written assignment duly acknowledged or proved. The name of the assignee shall be written upon any bond so transferred and in the books so kept in the office of such officer or agent.

[ 2011 c 336 s 808; 1983 c 167 s 108; 1961 c 141 s 4; 1915 c 91 s 1; RRS s 5494.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.